Florida, session 2026, SB306.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âFostering with 27 Dignity Act.â 28 Section 2.âSection 39.4011, Florida Statutes, is created to 29 read: 30 39.4011âLuggage for children placed in out-of-home care.â 31 (1)(a)âThe Legislature finds that children placed in out 32 of-home care often transport their personal belongings in trash 33 bags, which intensifies emotional distress for such children and 34 reinforces feelings of disposability. Accordingly, the 35 Legislature intends that every child in this state who is placed 36 in out-of-home care be provided with suitable luggage in order 37 to promote dignity, emotional well-being, and stability during 38 the childâs transition. 39 (b)âThis section shall be construed to advance the dignity, 40 emotional well-being, and stability of children placed in out 41 of-home care. This section may not be construed to limit or 42 impede existing rights, services, or protections afforded to 43 children in out-of-home care under federal or state law. 44 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 45 (a)ââCommunity-based care lead agencyâ has the same meaning 46 as in s. 409.986(3). 47 (b)ââLuggageâ means a suitcase, duffle bag, backpack, or 48 similar bag or container with handles made of durable material 49 which is designed to hold an individualâs personal belongings 50 for multiple uses. 51 (c)ââPublic-private partnershipâ means a partnership 52 between the department and a private entity, the purpose of 53 which is to finance, build, and operate projects that serve a 54 public purpose. 55 (3)âThe department shall provide each child taken into its 56 custody pursuant to s. 39.401 who is entering out-of-home care 57 and each child who is changing placements with a suitable piece 58 of luggage for the storage and transport of his or her personal 59 belongings. Luggage provided to a child under this subsection 60 belongs to the child and may not be reclaimed by the department 61 or retained by any adult with whom the child is placed. The 62 department is not required to provide new luggage to a child who 63 is changing placements if the child has previously been provided 64 with luggage under this subsection. 65 (4)âThe department shall do all of the following: 66 (a)âCollaborate with community-based care lead agencies, 67 advocacy groups, business partners, and entities in a public 68 private partnership with the department to coordinate logistics 69 and the distribution of the luggage. The department shall 70 establish and maintain a decentralized luggage supply and 71 develop procedures for storage and distribution of luggage. 72 (b)âPursue strategic partnerships to ensure that each child 73 entering out-of-home care or changing placements receives a 74 piece of luggage to store and transport the childâs personal 75 belongings. 76 (c)âMaintain a record of each time a trash bag is used to 77 transport the personal belongings of a child who is in out-of 78 home care. The record must include a statement providing the 79 reason the department did not provide the child with appropriate 80 luggage. 81 (5)âBy July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the 82 department shall provide to the President of the Senate and the 83 Speaker of the House of Representatives a report that includes 84 all of the following: 85 (a)âThe number of times trash bags were used to transport 86 the personal belongings of children in out-of-home care, and 87 statements providing the reasons the department failed to 88 provide such children with appropriate luggage. 89 (b)âThe departmentâs inventory management practices for, 90 and an inventory of, the luggage supply maintained pursuant to 91 this section. 92 (6)âThe department may solicit and accept gifts, grants, 93 and donations of any kind from any source for the purposes of 94 this section. Funding sources may include, but are not limited 95 to, any of the following: 96 (a)âFederal funds, including federal Title IV-E assistance. 97 (b)âMatching grant program agreements with or donations 98 from community and business entities. 99 (c)âPublic-private partnerships. 100 (d)âThe direct-support organization created under s. 101 402.57. 102 Section 3.âSubsection (4) of section 39.401, Florida 103 Statutes, is amended to read: 104 39.401âTaking a child alleged to be dependent into custody; 105 law enforcement officers and authorized agents of the 106 department.â 107 (4)âWhen a child is taken into custody pursuant to this 108 section, the department shall: 109 (a)âRequest that the childâs parent, caregiver, or legal 110 custodian disclose the names, relationships, and addresses of 111 all parents and prospective parents and all next of kin of the 112 child, so far as are known. 113 (b)âProvide each child entering out-of-home care with 114 suitable luggage, as defined in s. 39.4011, for the storage and 115 transport of his or her personal belongings. 116 Section 4.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 117 39.4085, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 118 39.4085âGoals for dependent children; responsibilities; 119 education; Office of the Childrenâs Ombudsman.â 120 (1)âThe Legislature finds that the design and delivery of 121 child welfare services should be directed by the principle that 122 the health and safety of children, including the freedom from 123 abuse, abandonment, or neglect, is of paramount concern and, 124 therefore, establishes the following goals for children in 125 shelter or foster care: 126 (c)âTo have their privacy protected;, have their personal 127 belongings secure and transported with them in a manner that 128 promotes their dignity, emotional well-being, and stability, 129 including the provision of at least one suitable piece of 130 luggage when they are placed in out-of-home care;, and, unless 131 otherwise ordered by the court, have uncensored communication, 132 including receiving and sending unopened communications and 133 having access to a telephone. 134 135 This subsection establishes goals and not rights. This 136 subsection does not require the delivery of any particular 137 service or level of service in excess of existing 138 appropriations. A person does not have a cause of action against 139 the state or any of its subdivisions, agencies, contractors, 140 subcontractors, or agents, based upon the adoption of or failure 141 to provide adequate funding for the achievement of these goals 142 by the Legislature. This subsection does not require the 143 expenditure of funds to meet the goals established in this 144 subsection except those funds specifically appropriated for such 145 purpose. 146 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.